Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-917
Contracts or liabilities in excess of budget; county not liable.

After the adoption of the county budget, no county shall be liable, either on any contract, implied contract or on any obligation arising by operation of law, for any merchandise, machinery, materials, supplies or other property delivered to or for any services rendered such county in pursuance of any contract entered into by or on behalf of such county in violation of the provisions of section 23-916.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 10, p. 229;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2110;

R.S.1943, § 23-917.

This section is applicable when contract is in violation of preceding section. Becker v. County of Platte, 155 Neb. 180, 50 N.W.2d 814 (1952).